Indiana, session 2026, SB154.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 20-18-2-14.5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 14.5. "Protective hairstyles"
includes such hairstyles as Afros, Bantu knots, braids, locks, and
twists, as well as hair that is tightly curled or coiled.
SECTION 2. IC 20-18-2-15.3 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 15.3. "Race", for purposes of this
title (except IC 20-19-3-12.4, IC 20-19-3-17, IC 20-19-3-18,
IC 20-30-5-23, IC 20-34-6-1, IC 20-46-1-8, IC 20-46-9-6, and
IC 20-51.4-5-3), includes traits historically associated with race,
such as hair texture and protective hairstyles.
SECTION 3. IC 21-7-13-27.5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 27.5. "Protective hairstyles"
includes such hairstyles as Afros, Bantu knots, braids, locks, and
twists, as well as hair that is tightly curled or coiled.
2026 IN 154—LS 6528/DI 149


SECTION 4. IC 21-7-13-28.5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 28.5. "Race" includes traits
historically associated with race, such as hair texture and
protective hairstyles.
SECTION 5. IC 22-9-1-3, AS AMENDED BY P.L.213-2016,
SECTION 27, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 3. As used in this chapter:
(a) "Person" means one (1) or more individuals, partnerships,
associations, organizations, limited liability companies, corporations,
labor organizations, cooperatives, legal representatives, trustees,
trustees in bankruptcy, receivers, and other organized groups of
persons.
(b) "Commission" means the civil rights commission created under
section 4 of this chapter.
(c) "Director" means the director of the civil rights commission.
(d) "Deputy director" means the deputy director of the civil rights
commission.
(e) "Commission attorney" means the deputy attorney general, such
assistants of the attorney general as may be assigned to the
commission, or such other attorney as may be engaged by the
commission.
(f) "Consent agreement" means a formal agreement entered into in
lieu of adjudication.
(g) "Affirmative action" means those acts that the commission
determines necessary to assure compliance with the Indiana civil rights
law.
(h) "Employer" means the state or any political or civil subdivision
thereof and any person employing six (6) or more persons within the
state, except that the term "employer" does not include:
(1) any nonprofit corporation or association organized exclusively
for fraternal or religious purposes;
(2) any school, educational, or charitable religious institution
owned or conducted by or affiliated with a church or religious
institution; or
(3) any exclusively social club, corporation, or association that is
not organized for profit.
(i) "Employee" means any person employed by another for wages or
salary. However, the term does not include any individual employed:
(1) by the individual's parents, spouse, or child; or
(2) in the domestic service of any person.
(j) "Labor organization" means any organization that exists for the
2026 IN 154—LS 6528/DI 149


purpose in whole or in part of collective bargaining or of dealing with
employers concerning grievances, terms, or conditions of employment
or for other mutual aid or protection in relation to employment.
(k) "Employment agency" means any person undertaking with or
without compensation to procure, recruit, refer, or place employees.
(l) "Discriminatory practice" means:
(1) the exclusion of a person from equal opportunities because of
race, religion, color, sex, disability, national origin, ancestry, or
status as a veteran;
(2) a system that excludes persons from equal opportunities
because of race, religion, color, sex, disability, national origin,
ancestry, or status as a veteran;
(3) the promotion of racial segregation or separation in any
manner, including but not limited to the inducing of or the
attempting to induce for profit any person to sell or rent any
dwelling by representations regarding the entry or prospective
entry in the neighborhood of a person or persons of a particular
race, religion, color, sex, disability, national origin, or ancestry;
(4) a violation of IC 22-9-5 that occurs after July 25, 1992, and is
committed by a covered entity (as defined in IC 22-9-5-4);
(5) the performance of an abortion solely because of the race,
color, sex, disability, national origin, or ancestry of the fetus; or
(6) a violation of any of the following statutes protecting the right
of conscience regarding abortion:
(A) IC 16-34-1-4.
(B) IC 16-34-1-5.
(C) IC 16-34-1-6.
Every discriminatory practice relating to the acquisition or sale of real
estate, education, public accommodations, employment, or the
extending of credit (as defined in IC 24-4.5-1-301.5) shall be
considered unlawful unless it is specifically exempted by this chapter.
(m) "Public accommodation" means any establishment that caters
or offers its services or facilities or goods to the general public.
(n) "Complainant" means:
(1) any individual charging on the individual's own behalf to have
been personally aggrieved by a discriminatory practice; or
(2) the director or deputy director of the commission charging that
a discriminatory practice was committed against a person (other
than the director or deputy director) or a class of people, in order
to vindicate the public policy of the state (as defined in section 2
of this chapter).
(o) "Complaint" means any written grievance that is:
2026 IN 154—LS 6528/DI 149


(1) sufficiently complete and filed by a complainant with the
commission; or
(2) filed by a complainant as a civil action in the circuit or
superior court having jurisdiction in the county in which the
alleged discriminatory practice occurred.
The original of any complaint filed under subdivision (1) shall be
signed and verified by the complainant.
(p) "Sufficiently complete" refers to a complaint that includes:
(1) the full name and address of the complainant;
(2) the name and address of the respondent against whom the
complaint is made;
(3) the alleged discriminatory practice and a statement of
particulars thereof;
(4) the date or dates and places of the alleged discriminatory
practice and if the alleged discriminatory practice is of a
continuing nature the dates between which continuing acts of
discrimination are alleged to have occurred; and
(5) a statement as to any other action, civil or criminal, instituted
in any other form based upon the same grievance alleged in the
complaint, together with a statement as to the status or disposition
of the other action.
No complaint shall be valid unless filed within one hundred eighty
(180) days from the date of the occurrence of the alleged
discriminatory practice.
(q) "Sex" as it applies to segregation or separation in this chapter
applies to all types of employment, education, public accommodations,
and housing. However:
(1) it shall not be a discriminatory practice to maintain separate
restrooms;
(2) it shall not be an unlawful employment practice for an
employer to hire and employ employees, for an employment
agency to classify or refer for employment any individual, for a
labor organization to classify its membership or to classify or refer
for employment any individual, or for an employer, labor
organization, or joint labor management committee controlling
apprenticeship or other training or retraining programs to admit
or employ any other individual in any program on the basis of sex
in those certain instances where sex is a bona fide occupational
qualification reasonably necessary to the normal operation of that
particular business or enterprise; and
(3) it shall not be a discriminatory practice for a private or
religious educational institution to continue to maintain and
2026 IN 154—LS 6528/DI 149


enforce a policy of admitting students of one (1) sex only.
(r) "Disabled" or "disability" means the physical or mental condition
of a person that constitutes a substantial disability. In reference to
employment under this chapter, "disabled or disability" also means the
physical or mental condition of a person that constitutes a substantial
disability unrelated to the person's ability to engage in a particular
occupation.
(s) "Veteran" means:
(1) a veteran of the armed forces of the United States;
(2) a member of the Indiana National Guard; or
(3) a member of a reserve component.
(t) "Protective hairstyles" includes such hairstyles as Afros,
Bantu knots, braids, locks, and twists, as well as hair that is tightly
curled or coiled.
(u) "Race" includes traits historically associated with race, such
as hair texture and protective hairstyles.
2026 IN 154—LS 6528/DI 149